Washington statutes.
RCW 18.74.027

Board—Officers—Meetings—Quorum.

The board shall elect from its members a chairperson and vice chairperson-secretary, who shall serve for one year and until their successors are elected. The board shall meet at least once a year and upon the call of the chairperson at such times and places as the chairperson designates. A majority of the board members appointed and serving constitutes a quorum for the transaction of board business. The affirmative vote of a majority of a quorum of the board is required to carry a motion or resolution, to adopt a rule, or to pass a measure. Meetings of the board shall be open and public, except the board may hold executive sessions to the extent permitted by chapter 42.30 RCW.

[ 2022 c 240 s 6; 1983 c 116 s 5.]